Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 10

Tennessee Lottery Funds for Education Projects Loan Act of 2003

4-31-1001. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Lottery Funds for Education Projects Loan Act of 2003.”

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 8 provided that:

“The provisions of this act providing for postsecondary financial assistance from the net proceeds of the state lottery shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.”

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 9 provided that:

“Tennessee HOPE scholarships, Tennessee HOPE access grants, General Assembly Merit Scholarships, and supplemental awards under §49-4-915, shall be awarded under the provisions of this act only to those eligible students who graduate from a Tennessee high school, complete high school in a Tennessee home school program, or obtain a GED, after January 1, 2003, but prior to July 1, 2005, and who enroll in and attend an elgible postsecondary institution before January 1, 2006. Such students shall be eligible to receive such scholarships and grants in accordance with §49-4-913 or §49-4-920, as such provisions are applicable to the scholarship or grant the student is receiving.”

Cross-References. Law enforcement efforts, §39-15-413.

Lotteries, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 5.

Lotteries, chain letters and pyramid clubs, §39-17-506.

Lottery not gambling, §8-47-127.

Lottery sales, title 39, chapter 17, part 6.

Possession of gambling device or record, forfeiture, §39-17-505.

State lottery proceeds, title 49, chapter 4, part 9.

Tennessee Education Lottery Corporation, §§4-51-132,4-51-133.

Tennessee Education Lottery Implementation Law, title 4, chapter 51.

4-31-1002. Legislative intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Financing costs incurred by local governments in connection with education projects are a significant factor in the ability of the local governments to meet the kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) educational needs of their communities; and

To the extent that financing of education projects can be accomplished less expensively through the pooling of needs and the use of less costly borrowing techniques, local governments would be better able to provide education projects, and other essential services for the benefit of their citizens and taxpayers.

It is accordingly in furtherance of the interests and welfare of all Tennesseans that the Tennessee local development authority shall be empowered and is authorized to issue its revenue bonds and to make the proceeds available for loans to local government units for capital projects for kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) educational purposes.

It is intended that the Tennessee local development authority be vested with all powers necessary to accomplish these purposes.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1003. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” means the Tennessee local development authority;

“Construction” means the building, reconstruction, creation, replacement, extension, repairing, betterment, improvement, alteration, equipment, extension, or acquisition, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of land and of rights in land, the engineering, architectural designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, and other action necessary in the construction of such capital projects, and the inspection and supervision of such capital projects;

“Education project” means a capital outlay project for kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) educational facilities; and

“Local education agency” or “LEA” has the same meaning as defined in § 49-3-302.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1004. Power and authority.

In addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, the authority has the power and is authorized to make loans to any local government unit to finance the construction of education projects pursuant to a loan agreement between the local government unit and the authority. Such loans shall be made from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of making such loans; provided, however, that the bonds and notes of the authority that may be outstanding at any time for such purpose shall not exceed seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000). Such bonds or notes may be payable from or secured by the general shortfall reserve subaccount created by § 4-51-111 as the authority may provide in the indentures or resolutions authorizing and securing the authority's bonds and notes, which indentures and resolutions may include covenants with the holders of the bonds and notes with respect to the use, including limitations on such use, of such subaccount.

Only local government units funding the local share of the basic education program for a local education agency shall be eligible to participate in the loan program.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1005. Loan agreements.

Subject to any existing contractual obligations of the local government unit and the local education agency, the authority may enter into loan agreements with any local government unit and any local government unit may enter into loan agreements with the authority for loans for education projects described in this part.

Any loan agreement may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the authority and the local government and shall additionally include, among other things, in substance, the following:

The amount of the loan, not to exceed the estimated reasonable cost of the project to be constructed, the financing costs of the authority, the administrative costs of the authority, and the amount of any required reserves as determined by the authority;

An agreement by the authority to pay part of the amount of the loan to the local government unit during the progress of the construction, or to pay the amount of the loan following completion of the construction, as may be agreed upon by the parties; and

An agreement by the local government unit:

To proceed expeditiously with and complete construction of the project in accordance with the plans approved pursuant to this part;

To commence operation of the project on its completion, and not to discontinue operations, change the use of, or dispose of the project without the approval of the authority;

To operate and maintain the project in accordance with applicable provisions of this part and in compliance with rules and regulations of the authority;

Not to contract with any for-profit-corporation, private person or firm for the operation or beneficial use of the for-profit-corporation, private person, or firm, notwithstanding any law authorizing such contracts, except upon approval by the authority of an application to the authority, which application shall include, but not be limited to, an opinion from a nationally recognized bond counsel that the contract will not affect the tax exempt status of the income of the authority's bonds or notes financing such facility under state or federal law;

To pledge such sources of revenue including, but not limited to, the tax required by § 4-31-1006 to pay the principal of and interest on the loan and to make such payments as and when due in accordance with the loan agreement; and

To establish and maintain adequate financial records for the project, and to cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, and to furnish a copy of such audit and, upon request, such financial records to the comptroller of the treasury.

The authority has the right to enter into such further agreements with a local government unit and require such further security as it may see fit prior to, or simultaneously with, the issuance of bonds or notes or to refuse to issue bonds or notes until such agreements or security, in any form that the authority may elect, are agreed to or are obtained.

Failure of a local government unit to file the audit or, upon request, the financial information with the comptroller of the treasury as required by the loan agreement each year until the loan, together with interest, is totally repaid constitutes a Class A misdemeanor and anyone violating this subsection (d), upon conviction, shall be liable for a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation, within the discretion of the court, and each day of continued violation constitutes a separate offense.

The department of education, in conjunction with the authority, shall develop an application and review procedure for loans under this program and shall make recommendations to the authority as to loan applications.

The authority and the department shall have such other authority as may be necessary or appropriate for the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this part.

Each local education agency is authorized to pledge to the authority, for the further security of the authority's bonds and notes, the state share of the nonclassroom capital outlay portion of the local education agency's basic education program funds as set forth in the formula model established or revised by the state board of education and approved by the general assembly. These pledges may be required by the authority as a condition to making loans to local government units.

The authority may promulgate additional guidelines, rules, or regulations in furtherance of the administration of this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

4-31-1006. Levy and collection of tax to pay for loan.

Whenever, and as often as, a local government unit enters into a loan agreement with the authority under this part, the governing body of such local government unit shall provide by resolution for the levy and collection of a tax upon all taxable property within the local government unit sufficient to pay when due all amounts payable under the loan agreement as and when such amounts become due and payable, including all fees and charges due the authority under such loan agreement and, furthermore, to pledge such tax and the full faith and credit of such local government unit to such payments; provided, however, that a special school district shall provide for the collection of such a tax upon the levy of the tax by the general assembly or shall pledge sufficient amounts from previously authorized taxes to cover all amounts due.

The tax provided for in subsection (a) shall be assessed, levied, collected, and paid in like manner as other taxes of the local government unit, except as provided in subsection (a).

The tax provided for in subsection (a) shall not be included within any statutory or other limitation of rate or amount for such local government, but shall be excluded therefrom and be in addition thereto and in excess thereof, notwithstanding and without regard to the prohibitions, restrictions, or requirements of any other law, whether public or private.

There shall be set aside from the tax levy into a special fund an amount sufficient for the payment of the annual amount due under any such loan agreement and such additional amounts as may be required by the loan agreement for reserves. The money in such funds shall be used exclusively for such purposes and shall not be used for any other purpose until such annual amount has been paid in full or such reserve requirement has been fully satisfied.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1007. Failure to remit funds.

In the event any local government unit having entered into a loan agreement shall fail to remit funds in accordance with a loan agreement, the authority shall notify the commissioner of education who shall instruct the commissioner of finance and administration to deliver within five (5) days notice of such failure to the local government unit.

In the event the local government unit shall fail to remit the amount set forth in the notice within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the notice, the commissioner of finance and administration shall, without further authorization, withhold such sum or part of such sum from the state share of the nonclassroom capital outlay portion of the basic education program fund that is otherwise apportioned to such local education agency and pledged to the authority for the loan to such local government unit, for the benefit of the authority issuing bonds or notes for the purposes referred to in this part.

In the event there are not sufficient funds in the state share of the nonclassroom capital outlay portion of the basic education program fund still held by the commissioner of finance and administration for the local education agency to cure the deficiency in repayments to the authority, the commissioner shall transfer to the authority funds equal to the amount of the remaining payment deficiency from the general shortfall reserve subaccount of the lottery for education account as established by § 4-51-111, subject to any limitations on the use of the subaccount established pursuant to § 4-31-1004(a). The commissioner of education shall instruct the commissioner of finance and administration to withhold from the state share of the nonclassroom capital outlay portion of subsequent basic education program funds apportioned to such local education agency an amount to replenish the general shortfall reserve subaccount of the lottery for education account equal to the amount transferred to the authority.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1008. Rights of the authority.

The authority has the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the local government unit, the governing body, and any proper officer, agent, or employee of the local government unit to carry out any agreements and to perform its and their duties under this part or under any rule or regulation of the authority adopted pursuant to this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1009. Limits on indebtedness.

Local government units may enter into loan agreements under this part notwithstanding and without regard to any limit on indebtedness provided by law.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1010. Resolutions.

All action required or authorized to be taken under this part by the governing body of any local government unit may be by resolution, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting of the governing body at which such resolution is introduced, and shall take effect immediately upon its adoption.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1011. Provisions supplemental.

This part shall be in addition to and supplemental to any other law providing for the financing of education projects by local government units.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no proceedings by a local government unit or local education agency shall be required for loan agreements hereunder, except as provided by this part.

No requirements or restrictions applicable to borrowing by a local government unit contained in any other law shall be applicable to loans under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.

4-31-1012. Pledges.

Any pledge made by the authority pursuant to this chapter, or by a local government unit pursuant to a loan program agreement, or by a local education agency in connection therewith shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made, the moneys or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority or local government unit, as applicable, shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, local government units, or local education agency as applicable, irrespective of whether such parties have notice of those claims.

Recording of the resolution or any other instrument by which a pledge is created is not required.

Acts 2003, ch. 298, § 5.